Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB644.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky General Assembly Medal of Distinction is hereby created.
(2) Persons eligible to receive the medal include:
(a) Present members of the United States Armed Forces, the National Guard,
or a reserve component of the Armed Forces or National Guard, and
veterans of those services who were separated or released therefrom with an
honorable discharge, discharge under honorable conditions, or general
discharge under honorable conditions, and are stationed or otherwise
residing in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or were born in the
Commonwealth;
(b) Present and former first responders operating in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, including firefighters, emergency medical services personnel,
ambulance services personnel, peace officers, sheriffs, public safety
telecommunicators, and others who are employed or volunteer their time to
render aid to persons in distress;
(c) Citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(d) Entities operating within the Commonwealth of Kentucky or otherwise
providing services to the citizens of the Commonwealth.
(3) The medal shall be the preeminent award conferred by the Commonwealth and
may be awarded to recognize:
(a) The commission of a valorous or heroic deed performed in the saving of a
life;
(b) An injury or death, or having faced the threat of injury or death, in the
Page 1 of 3
BR040800.100 - 408 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 408
service of the Commonwealth or the individual's community or on behalf of
the health, welfare, or safety of other persons;
(c) Service to persons within the Commonwealth, the Commonwealth as a
whole, or communities within the Commonwealth of such magnitude that
the provision of that service has substantially and remarkedly improved the
quality of life of persons within the Commonwealth; or
(d) The commission of such other meritorious acts as in the opinion of the
General Assembly warrant the award of the medal.
(4) (a) The Legislative Research Commission shall designate an interim joint
committee or subcommittee thereof to serve as a selection committee to
receive and evaluate nominations for the Kentucky General Assembly
Medal of Distinction submitted under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) Any member of the General Assembly may submit written nominations for
the awarding of the medal to the chair or co-chair of the selection
committee.
(c) Awardees of the medal shall be designated through the passage of a
concurrent resolution during a regular session of the General Assembly.
(d) Preliminary work products of the selection committee, including submitted
nominations and initial drafts, shall be confidential under KRS 7.117 and
shall not be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(5) The Legislative Research Commission shall determine the design of the medal,
which shall be such that it is practical to be worn on a uniform.
(6) The member or members who nominate a medal awardee under subsection (4)(b)
of this section shall be personally responsible for the cost of the medal and may
use the allowance specified in KRS 6.220 to pay for the costs of the medal.
(7) State and local agencies that regulate uniforms worn by persons under their
Page 2 of 3
BR040800.100 - 408 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 408
command shall allow the display of the medal upon the uniforms, but may restrict
the display of the medal under certain circumstances in the same manner as
other medals and awards worn on uniforms by persons under their command.
Page 3 of 3
BR040800.100 - 408 - XXXX 3/18/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed